windows/es.aff
SFX W   ostar uesten      ostar
SFX W   ostrar uestren     ostrar
SFX W   ovar  ueven       ovar
SFX W   gar   eguen       ugar
SFX W   cer   zcan        [^fh]acer
SFX W   cer   gan         [fh]acer
SFX W   er    gan         aler
SFX W   er    igan        aer
SFX W   caber quepan      caber
SFX W   cer   zcan        ecer
SFX W   eder  iedan       eder
SFX W   er    an          [eo]er
SFX W   er    igan        oer
SFX W   er    yan         oer
SFX W   ender iendan      ender
SFX W   er    gan         [eo]ner
SFX W   erder ierdan      erder
SFX W   erer  ieran       erer
SFX W   erner iernan      erner
SFX W   erter iertan      erter
SFX W   oder  uedan       oder
SFX W   ocer  uezan       cocer
SFX W   cer   zcan        [^c]ocer
SFX W   oler  uelan       oler
SFX W   olver uelvan      olver
SFX W   orcer uerzan      orcer
SFX W   order uerdan      order
SFX W   over  uevan       over
SFX W   aber  epan        saber
SFX W   ir    gan         alir
SFX W   ebir  iban        ebir
SFX W   ecir  igan        ecir
SFX W   edir  idan        edir
SFX W   egir  ijan        egir
SFX W   emir  iman        emir
SFX W   eír   ían         eír
SFX W   eñir  iñan        eñir
SFX W   eguir igan        eguir
SFX W   enchir inchan      enchir
SFX W   enir  engan       enir
SFX W   endir indan       endir
SFX W   erir  ieran       erir
SFX W   entir ientan      entir
SFX W   ernir iernan      ernir
SFX W   ertir iertan      ertir
SFX W   ervir irvan       [^h]ervir
SFX W   estir istan       estir
SFX W   unir  únan        eunir
SFX W   etir  itan        etir
SFX W   ervir iervan      hervir
SFX W   irir  ieran       irir
SFX W   ibir  íban        ohibir
SFX W   ír    igan        oír
SFX W   orir  ueran       orir
SFX W   ormir uerman      ormir
SFX W   cir   zcan        ucir
SFX W   ir    yan         [^g]uir
SFX W   üir   uyan        güir
SFX W   ir    an          ullir
SFX W   ir    an          uñir
SFX W   undir úndan       ehundir
SFX W   erguir irgan       erguir
SFX W   erguir yergan      erguir
SFX W   ar    uviese      andar
SFX W   ar    uviera      andar
SFX W   r     se          [^a]ndar
SFX W   r     ra          [^a]ndar
SFX W   r     se          [^n]dar
SFX W   r     ra          [^n]dar
SFX W   r     se          [^d]ar
SFX W   r     ra          [^d]ar
SFX W   aber  upiera      aber
SFX W   aber  upiese      aber
SFX W   er    iera        [^fh]acer
SFX W   er    iese        [^fh]acer
SFX W   acer  iciera      [fh]acer
SFX W   acer  iciese      [fh]acer
SFX W   er    iera        aler
SFX W   er    iese        aler
SFX W   er    yese        caer
SFX W   er    yera        caer
SFX W   er    iera        e[cd]er
SFX W   er    iese        e[cd]er
SFX W   er    yera        [eo]er
SFX W   er    yese        [eo]er
SFX W   er    iera        ender
SFX W   er    iese        ender
SFX W   ener  uviera      ener
SFX W   ener  uviese      ener
SFX W   er    iera        er[dnt]er
SFX W   er    iese        er[dnt]er
SFX W   erer  isiera      erer
SFX W   erer  isiese      erer
SFX W   er    iera        o[clv]er
SFX W   er    iese        o[clv]er
SFX W   oder  udiera      oder
SFX W   oder  udiese      oder
SFX W   er    iera        olver
SFX W   er    iese        olver
SFX W   oner  usiera      oner
SFX W   oner  usiese      oner
SFX W   er    iera        or[cd]er
SFX W   er    iese        or[cd]er
SFX W   er    jese        raer
SFX W   er    jera        raer
SFX W   r     era         alir
SFX W   r     ese         alir
SFX W   ebir  ibiese      ebir
SFX W   ebir  ibiera      ebir
SFX W   ecir  ijese       ecir
SFX W   ecir  ijera       ecir
SFX W   edir  idiese      edir
SFX W   edir  idiera      edir
SFX W   egir  igiese      egir
SFX W   egir  igiera      egir
SFX W   emir  imiese      emir
SFX W   emir  imiera      emir
SFX W   eír   iese        eír
SFX W   eír   iera        eír
SFX W   eñir  iñese       eñir
SFX W   eñir  iñera       eñir
SFX W   eguir iguiese     eguir
SFX W   eguir iguiera     eguir
SFX W   enchir inchiese    enchir
SFX W   enchir inchiera    enchir
SFX W   endir indiese     endir
SFX W   endir indiera     endir
SFX W   enir  iniese      enir
SFX W   enir  iniera      enir
SFX W   entir intiera     entir
SFX W   entir intiese     entir
SFX W   erir  iriera      erir
SFX W   erir  iriese      erir
SFX W   r     ese         ernir
SFX W   r     era         ernir
SFX W   ertir irtiera     ertir
SFX W   ertir irtiese     ertir
SFX W   ervir irviera     ervir
SFX W   ervir irviese     ervir
SFX W   estir istiera     estir
SFX W   estir istiese     estir
SFX W   r     ese         eunir
SFX W   r     era         eunir
SFX W   etir  itiera      etir
SFX W   etir  itiese      etir
SFX W   irir  iriera      irir
SFX W   irir  iriese      irir
SFX W   r     ese         ohibir
SFX W   r     era         ohibir
SFX W   ír    yera        oír
SFX W   ír    yese        oír
SFX W   orir  uriera      orir
SFX W   orir  uriese      orir
SFX W   ormir urmiera     ormir
SFX W   ormir urmiese     ormir
SFX W   cir   jera        ducir
SFX W   cir   jese        ducir
SFX W   r     era         [^d]ucir
SFX W   r     ese         [^d]ucir
SFX W   ir    yera        [^g]uir
SFX W   ir    yese        [^g]uir
SFX W   üir   uyese       güir
SFX W   üir   uyera       güir
SFX W   ir    era         ullir
SFX W   ir    ese         ullir
SFX W   ir    era         uñir
SFX W   ir    ese         uñir
SFX W   r     era         ehundir
SFX W   r     ese         ehundir
SFX W   erguir irguiera    erguir
SFX W   erguir irguiese    erguir
SFX W   ar    uvieses     andar
SFX W   ar    uvieras     andar
SFX W   r     ses         [^a]ndar
SFX W   r     ras         [^a]ndar
SFX W   r     ses         [^n]dar
SFX W   r     ras         [^n]dar
SFX W   r     ses         [^d]ar
SFX W   r     ras         [^d]ar
SFX W   aber  upieras     aber
SFX W   aber  upieses     aber
SFX W   er    ieras       [^fh]acer
SFX W   er    ieses       [^fh]acer
SFX W   acer  icieras     [fh]acer
SFX W   acer  icieses     [fh]acer
SFX W   er    ieras       aler
SFX W   er    ieses       aler
SFX W   er    yeses       caer
SFX W   er    yeras       caer
SFX W   er    ieras       e[cd]er
SFX W   er    ieses       e[cd]er
SFX W   er    yeras       [eo]er
SFX W   er    yeses       [eo]er
SFX W   er    ieras       ender
SFX W   er    ieses       ender
SFX W   ener  uvieras     ener
SFX W   ener  uvieses     ener
SFX W   er    ieras       er[dnt]er
SFX W   er    ieses       er[dnt]er
SFX W   erer  isieras     erer
SFX W   erer  isieses     erer
SFX W   er    ieras       o[clv]er
SFX W   er    ieses       o[clv]er
SFX W   oder  udieras     oder
SFX W   oder  udieses     oder
SFX W   er    ieras       olver
SFX W   er    ieses       olver
SFX W   oner  usieras     oner
SFX W   oner  usieses     oner
SFX W   er    ieras       or[cd]er
SFX W   er    ieses       or[cd]er
SFX W   er    jeses       raer
SFX W   er    jeras       raer
SFX W   r     eras        alir
SFX W   r     eses        alir
SFX W   ebir  ibieses     ebir
SFX W   ebir  ibieras     ebir
SFX W   ecir  ijeses      ecir
SFX W   ecir  ijeras      ecir
SFX W   edir  idieses     edir
SFX W   edir  idieras     edir
SFX W   egir  igieses     egir
SFX W   egir  igieras     egir
SFX W   emir  imieses     emir
SFX W   emir  imieras     emir
SFX W   eír   ieses       eír
SFX W   eír   ieras       eír
SFX W   eñir  iñeses      eñir
SFX W   eñir  iñeras      eñir
SFX W   eguir iguieses    eguir
SFX W   eguir iguieras    eguir
SFX W   enchir inchieses   enchir
SFX W   enchir inchieras   enchir
SFX W   endir indieses    endir
SFX W   endir indieras    endir
SFX W   enir  inieses     enir
SFX W   enir  inieras     enir
SFX W   entir intieras    entir
SFX W   entir intieses    entir
SFX W   erir  irieras     erir
SFX W   erir  irieses     erir
SFX W   r     eses        ernir
SFX W   r     eras        ernir
SFX W   ertir irtieras    ertir
SFX W   ertir irtieses    ertir
SFX W   ervir irvieras    ervir
SFX W   ervir irvieses    ervir
SFX W   estir istieras    estir
