windows/es.dic
abarrotar/PSVWX
abolir/HQTVWXt
abroncar/PQSTVWXt
acabar/IOPQRSTVWXrt
acaparar/IPQSTVWXt
acepillar/PSVWX
acicular/PSVWX
acombar/OPQRSTVWXrt
acostumbrar/OPQRSTVWXrt
acubilar/PSVWX
adelantar/IOPQRSTVWXrt
adormilar/OPRSVWXr
afatar/PSVWX
africanizar/PSVWX
aglomerar/HLOPQRSTVWXrt
aguzar/IPQSTVWXt
aislar/ILNOPQRSTWXrt
alanzar/PSVWX
alejar/IOPQRSTUVWXrtu
aligerar/IOPQRSTVWXrt
alojar/IOPQRSTVWXrt
amadrigar/PSVWX
amar/HLOPQRSTVWXrt
amenorgar/PSVWX
amoragar/PSVWX
amueblar/PQSTVWXt
angelizar/PSVWX
anticuar/NOPQRSTWXrt
apalpar/PSVWX
apechar/PSVWX
apiñar/IOPQRSTVWXrt
apoquinar/PQSTVWXt
apuñear/PSVWX
archivar/PQSTVWXt
arramblar/PSVWX
arrimar/OPQRSTVWXrt
asar/OPQRSTVWXrt
asignar/HOPQRSTUVWXrtu
asumir/OQRTVWXrt
atarear/OPQRSTVWXrt
atisbar/PQSTVWXt
atrancar/PQSTVWXt
augurar/HOPQRSTVWXrt
avenir/IOQWYoq
azarar/OPQRSTVWXrt
bajar/OPQRSTUVWXrtu
bambolear/LOPRSVWXr
bardar/PQSTVWXt
bastardear/PSVWX
bellotear/PSVWX
bizquear/PSVWX
bolsiquear/PSVWX
botar/PQSTVWXt
brujulear/PSVWX
cabalgar/ILPQSTVWXt
cachetear/OPQRSTVWXrt
calcular/HOPQRSTUVWXrtu
campanillear/PSVWX
capear/PSVWX
carcajear/OPRSVWXr
cascar/ILOPQRSTVWXrt
cazar/OPQRSTVWXrt
centuplicar/OPQRSTVWXrt
chamullar/PSVWX
charlotear/PSVWX
chirriar/LPSWX
chuperretear/PQSTVWXt
circunvalar/HPQSTVWXt
climatizar/HPQSTVWXt
codificar/HOPQRSTUVWXrtu
colimar/HPSVWX
compadrar/PSVWX
comprobar/HLOPQRSTUWXrtu
conculcar/HPSVWX
consagrar/HOPQRSTVWXrt
contraindicar/HLPQSTVWXt
contundir/VWX
coplear/PSVWX
coyotear/PQSTVWXt
cubrir/HIOQRTUVWYrt
debutar/LPSVWX
delimitar/HOPQRSTVWXrt
derramar/IOPQRSTVWXrt
desafinar/HOPRSVWXr
desamorrar/PSVWX
desarropar/PSVWX
desbaratar/IOPQRSTVWXrt
descangallar/OPQRSTVWXrt
descerar/PSVWX
desconfiar/NPSWX
descuajeringar/OPQRSTVWXrt
desembrazar/PSVWX
desencaprichar/PSVWX
desenlutar/PSVWX
desertificar/OPQRSTVWXrt
desganar/NOPQRSTVWXrt
deshincar/PSVWX
deslazar/IPSVWX
desmelenar/PSVWX
desoldar/OPQRSTWXrt
despasar/PSVWX
desplayar/PSVWX
desreglar/OPQRSTVWXrt
destrozar/OPQRSTVWXrt
detectar/OPQRSTUVWXrtu
dilacerar/HPSVWX
disgustar/OPRSVWXr
donjuanear/PSVWX
elegantizar/PSVWX
embazar/OPRSVWXr
embosquecer/WX
empalagar/IOPQRSTVWXrt
emperchar/PSVWX
empuntar/PSVWX
encabruñar/PSVWX
encanillar/PSVWX
encastrar/PQSTVWXt
encismar/PSVWX
encrasar/PSVWX
enfaldar/PSVWX
engarabatar/PSVWX
engrescar/PSVWX
enjordanar/PSVWX
enmangar/PSVWX
enrehojar/PSVWX
enseñorear/OPQRSTVWXrt
enternecer/INOQRTWXoq
entrencar/PSVWX
envarbascar/PSVWX
erguir/IOQWY
escamotear/PQSTVWXt
esclerotizar/HOPQRSTVWXrt
esdrujulizar/PSVWX
especializar/HOPRSVWXr
esquilar/OPQRSTUVWXrtu
estipular/HOPQRSTUVWXrtu
etimologizar/PSVWX
explicar/HOPQRSTUVWXrtu
fagocitar/PQSTVWXt
fibrilar/HPSVWX
fluctuar/HLPSWX
frenillar/PSVWX
garantir/VWX
gobernar/HLOPQRSTUWXrtu
graznar/PSVWX
halagar/PQSTVWXt
hermanar/IOPQRSTVWXrt
hollar/PQSTWXt
hurtar/PQSTVWXt
imprimir/OQRTUVWXrtu
indisponer/OQRTWYoq
inquinar/PSVWX
interpaginar/PQSTVWXt
jabardear/PSVWX
judaizar/HLPSWX
lancinar/LPSVWX
leudar/PSVWX
lleudar/PSVWX
machucar/IPSVWX
maltratar/IOPQRSTVWXrt
manutener/QTWXo
mascar/PSVWX
mendigar/LPQSTVWXt
micronizar/PQSTVWXt
modorrar/PSVWX
mordicar/HLPQSTVWXt
multiplicar/HOPQRSTUVWXrtu
negar/HIOPQRSTUWXrtu
obrar/PSVWX
orbitar/PSVWX
palanquear/PQSTVWXt
parcializar/PQSTVWXt
peatonalizar/HPQSTVWXt
perfumear/PQSTVWXt
piñonear/PSVWX
pisotear/PQSTVWXt
poder/OQSWYZ
postinear/PSVWX
premorir/LWY
prodigar/OPQRSTVWXrt
proyectar/LOPQRSTVWXrt
querer/OQRSTWXrt
rapar/ILOPQRSTVWXrt
reacuñar/HPSVWX
rebordear/PSVWX
recejar/PSVWX
reconstituir/OQWYoq
redistribuir/OQWYoq
refrigerar/HLPQSTVWXt
rehusar/PQSTWXt
relumbrar/PSVWX
renombrar/PQSTVWXt
repreguntar/PQSTVWXt
resentir/IOWYo
restribar/PSVWX
retratar/HOPQRSTUVWXrtu
revolcar/OPQRSTWXrt
romper/ILOQRTUVWYrtu
rustrir/VWX
salpullir/QWY
segar/PQSTWXt
sinalefar/PQSTVWXt
sobreentender/QTWXt
sofrenar/PSVWX
sonrojar/OPQRSTVWXrt
subscribir/QTVWXYt
suplir/QTVWXt
tamboritear/PSVWX
teledirigir/QTVWXt
tildar/PQSTVWXt
torpedear/IPQSTVWXt
transfundir/HVWX
traslapar/PSVWX
trefilar/PQSTVWXt
tronquear/PSVWX
unir/NOQRTUVWXrtu
vaporizar/HOPQRSTVWXrt
versificar/HPSVWX
volcar/OPQRSTWXrt
zaquear/PSVWX
